Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5231.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-10.3 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Uniform
Commercial Driver’s License Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-10.3-13.1. Education and training to recognize and report human trafficking.
Any trade school or education program offering instruction in the operation of commercial
motor vehicles for licensure pursuant to this chapter, and any entity employing a certified
commercial driving instructor to provide commercial driver training, as defined in this chapter,
shall offer and include, as part of the commercial motor vehicle driving course curriculum,
industry-specific training on the recognition, prevention, and reporting of human trafficking. The
office of the postsecondary commissioner shall be responsible for ensuring the instruction
requirements of this section are met. The postsecondary commissioner, in conjunction with
organizations that specialize in the recognition and prevention of human trafficking, shall annually
review and update the training to include changes and trends in human trafficking.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000747
========